Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-376
Doubted marriage; procedure.

When the validity of a marriage is doubted, either party may file a complaint and the court shall decree it annulled or affirmed according to the proof. Notice shall be given the other party as in the case of a complaint for dissolution of marriage.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 31.